Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.555

Waiver of tuition and fees for students of foreign nations—Intent.

The legislature intends to permit the governing boards of the four-year institutions of higher education to waive tuition and fees for certain students of foreign nations. To the greatest extent possible, students chosen for these waivers and for the institutions' own approved study abroad programs shall reflect the range of socioeconomic and ethnic characteristics of the students' institutions and native countries.

[ 1986 c 232 s 1.]